Vermont, session 2025-2026, H898.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 227f is added to read:
§ 227f. TRANSITION FROM COPPER-BASED TO FIBER-BASED
TELEPHONE SERVICE; CONSUMER PROTECTIONS
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) When a telecommunications carrier transitions its infrastructure from
a copper-based network to a fiber-based network, it is critical to ensure that
existing customers have continued access to high-quality, reliable
telecommunications service.
(2) The transition to Voice over Internet Protocol (VoIP) service over a
fiber-based network may affect service reliability, consumer choices, and
access to emergency services, particularly for vulnerable populations,
including older adults and those with medical dependencies.
(3) Unlike traditional service over a self-powered copper-based
network—otherwise known as plain old telephone service or POTS—a fiber-
based service relies upon an optical network terminal (ONT), which must be
connected to a power source or outlet at a customer’s home or business in
order to be operational.
VT LEG #387431 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE H.898
2026 Page 2 of 6
(4) In the event of a power outage, most backup batteries connected to
the ONT will provide VoIP service for up to eight hours; however, backup
power systems that provide service for a longer duration are also available.
(5) Previously, federal regulations had required providers of facilities-
based, fixed, residential voice services that are not line powered, such as VoIP
service, to offer for sale at least one option with eight hours of standby backup
power, as well as an additional 24-hour option, to ensure customer equipment
maintained E-911 access during a power outage. However, those requirements
were sunset by operation of law on September 1, 2025.
(6) There is a need for clear customer safeguards to ensure continuous
and reliable service during the transition to and in the provision of VoIP
service and for enhanced State oversight of customer access to emergency
services, generally.
(b) Intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to balance telephone
network modernization with customer safeguards during a copper-to-fiber
network transition and to enhance State oversight with regard to ensuring that
all telephone customers have continuous and reliable access to emergency
services.
(c) Definition. As used in this section, “VoIP service” means an
interconnected, facilities-based, fixed, residential voice service that is not line
powered.
VT LEG #387431 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE H.898
2026 Page 3 of 6
(d) Notice of network transition. A telecommunications carrier proposing
to transition from a copper-based network to a fiber-based network in its
service territory shall provide written notice by U.S. first-class mail and email
to the Commissioner of Public Service, the E-911 Board, and all affected
customers at least 120 days, 60 days, and 30 days prior to the planned
transition. In a form and manner prescribed by the Commissioner, the notice
shall include:
(1) the date the transition is expected to occur;
(2) the details of service changes, including any potential impact on a
customer’s telephone service and whether the carrier will offer a reasonably
comparable replacement service in relation to pricing, terms, and conditions;
(3) information sufficient to inform customers about the need to test and
verify any auxiliary telecommunications devices, such as alarm systems and
medical alert devices, to ensure they function properly over the new VoIP
service;
(4) disclosures about whether the carrier is obligated to provide
regulated landline voice service to residential customers in its service territory;
(5) information on the need for and availability of backup power options
and battery backup devices to maintain service continuity during a power
outage;
VT LEG #387431 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE H.898
2026 Page 4 of 6
(6) a link to the consumer protection rules in Public Utility Commission
Rule 7.600, Standards for Billing, Credit and Collections, and Customer
Information for Telecommunications Carriers, which includes a Consumer Bill
of Rights, or how to obtain a hard copy of Rule 7.600 by U.S. mail;
(7) contact information for carrier customer support and for the Division
of Consumer Affairs and Public Information within the Department of Public
Service;
(8) information regarding the availability of and eligibility for any
federal, State, or carrier discount programs applicable to the replacement VoIP
service; and
(9) any other disclosures deemed necessary and appropriate by the
Commissioner of Public Service to ensure that the public convenience and
necessity will not be adversely affected by the transition or discontinuance of
service.
(e) VoIP service provider reporting. Beginning on or before November 1,
2026, and annually thereafter, each VoIP service provider shall file a report
with the Department of Public Service detailing the number of customers who
have purchased battery backup systems from the carrier, including the
purchase and installation costs, if applicable; and documenting any known
incidents where E-911 access was impaired or interrupted due to the lack of
backup power.
VT LEG #387431 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE H.898
2026 Page 5 of 6
(f) Enforcement. A telecommunications carrier that violates a provision of
this section shall be subject to the remedies authorized by this title, including
penalties authorized by section 30 of this title and injunctions authorized by
section 209 of this title.
(g) Department monitoring. In addition to reviewing the annual reports
required under subsection (e) of this section, the Commissioner of Public
Service shall review, quarterly, the outage reports submitted to the E-911
Board pursuant to the Board’s Rule Governing Outage Reporting
Requirements for Originating Carriers and Electric Power Companies, as well
as the Department’s telecommunications service availability data and any other
relevant data available to the Commissioner, to determine if there are areas of
the State particularly prone to carrier or power outages and assess whether
locations in those areas may be vulnerable to extended periods of time without
access to E-911 service. In addition, the Commissioner, in coordination with
the Office of the Attorney General, shall establish a mechanism for receiving
and tracking any consumer complaints concerning VoIP service quality and
reliability.
(h) Consumer education and outreach. The Commissioner shall develop
consumer education and community outreach initiatives designed to ensure:
VT LEG #387431 v.1

AS PASSED BY HOUSE H.898
2026 Page 6 of 6
(1) all customers impacted by the transition from a copper-based
network to a fiber-based network are aware of their rights and the carrier’s
obligations during the transition; and
(2) all customers who use VoIP service are aware of the risks and best
practices concerning emergency preparedness in the event of a power outage.
(i) Department report. The Commissioner shall include in the
Commissioner’s annual report to the General Assembly findings and
recommendations related to the implementation and enforcement of this
section. In the 2027 report only, the Commissioner shall consider and make
recommendations on:
(1) whether the State should establish a program designed to provide
financial assistance to customers with low income for costs associated with the
purchase and installation of backup power equipment; and
(2) whether the State should enact additional backup power obligations
applicable to VoIP service providers.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION
This act shall take effect on passage and shall apply to all
telecommunications carriers on September 1, 2026.
VT LEG #387431 v.1